Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-916
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 28-916 to 28-923, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Juror means any person who is a member of any petit jury or grand jury, impaneled by any court of this state or by any public servant authorized by law to impanel a jury. The word juror also includes any person who has been drawn or summoned to attend as a potential juror;

(2) Testimony means oral or written statements, documents, or any other evidence that may be offered by or through a witness in an official proceeding; and

(3) Official proceeding means a proceeding heard or which may be heard before any legislative, judicial, administrative, or other governmental agency or official authorized to take evidence under oath, including any referee, hearing examiner, commissioner, notary, or other person taking testimony or deposition in connection with any such proceeding.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 201;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 40.